Connecticut, session 2026, HB05146.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) The brownfields working group
established pursuant to section 32-770 of the general statutes, in
consultation with the Commissioner of Economic and Community
Development and the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection, shall conduct a study of issues relating to the remediation
and development of brownfields in this state, including, but not limited
to, any such issues caused by the implementation of the release-based
cleanup program established pursuant to chapter 445b of the general
statutes.
(b) The working group may request any data or other information
required to conduct such study from the Commissioner of Economic
and Community Development and the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on the results of such study to the joint standing committees of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
commerce and the environment, in accordance with the provisions of

Substitute House Bill No. 5146
section 11-4a of the general statutes.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 19, 2026
Special Act No. 26-7 2 of 2